src/fst/lexicon.tmp.lexc
LEXICON Interrogative  !!= @CODE@ \\
awîna+Pron+Interr+A+Sg:awîna # "who,whose" ; !!= @CODE@
awîniki+Pron+Interr+A+Pl:awîniki # "who" ; !!= @CODE@
awînihi+Pron+Interr+A+Obv:awînihi # "who" ; !!= @CODE@
awîniwâ+Pron+Interr+A+Obv:awîniwâ # "who" ; !!= @CODE@

kîkwây+Pron+Interr+A+Sg:kîkwây # "what" ; ! Wolvengrey
kîkwây+Pron+Interr+A+Pl:kîkwâyak # "what" ;
kîkwây+Pron+Interr+A+Obv:kîkwâya # "what" ;
kîkwây+Pron+Interr+I+Sg:kîkwây # "what" ;
kîkwây+Pron+Interr+I+Pl:kîkwâya # "what" ;

! Interrogative demonstratives
tâna+Pron+Interr+Dem+A+Sg:tâna # "which one" ;
tâniki+Pron+Interr+Dem+A+Pl:tâniki # "which ones" ;
tânihi+Pron+Interr+Dem+A+Obv:tânihi # "which one(s)" ;
tānima+Pron+Interr+Dem+I+Sg:tānima # "which one" ;
tânihi+Pron+Interr+Dem+I+Pl:tânihi # "which ones" ;

! Locative interrogative demonstratives
tâniwâ+Pron+Interr+Dem+Loc+A+Sg:tâniwâ # "where" ; ! Wolvengrey
tâniwêhkâk+Pron+Interr+Dem+Loc+A+Pl:tâniwêhkâk # "where" ;
tâniwêhâ+Pron+Interr+Dem+Loc+A+Obv:tâniwêhâ # "where" ;
tâniwê+Pron+Interr+Dem+Loc+I+Sg:tâniwê # "where" ;
tâniwêhâ+Pron+Interr+Dem+Loc+I+Pl:tâniwêhâ # "where" ;

! Additional Oblique Interrogative Proforms ! <- Wolvengrey
! Listed currently already under particles
! tânispî+Ipc+Interr:tânispî # "when" ;
! tânispîhk+Ipc+Interr:tânispîhk # "when" ;
! tânita+Ipc+Interr:tânita # "how" ;
! tânêhki+Ipc+Interr:tânêhki # "why" ;
! tâniyikohk+Ipc+Interr:tâniyikohk # "how much" ;
! tânimayikohk+Ipc+Interr:tânimayikohk # "how much" ;
! tânitahto+Ipc+Interr:tânitahto # "how many" ;
! tânimatahto+Ipc+Interr:tânimatahto # "how many"
! tânitahtwâw+Ipc+Interr:tânitahtwâw # "how many times" ;
! tânimatahtwâw+Ipc+Interr:tânimatahtwâw # "how many times" ;
! tânitowahk+Ipc+Interr:tânitowahk # "what kind" ;
! tânitowihk+Ipc+Interr:tânitowihk # "(in) what kind of place" ;
! tânitahtwayak+Ipc+Interr:tânitahtwayak # "how many ways/directions" ;

LEXICON Indefinite !!= @CODE@ \\
awiyak+Pron+Indef+A+Sg:awiyak # "someone" ; !!= @CODE@
awiyak+Pron+Indef+A+Pl:awiyakak # "some people" ;!!= @CODE@

LEXICON Demonstrative !!= @CODE@   \\
!! ANIMATE \\
awa+Pron+Dem+Prox+A+Sg:awa # "this" ; !!= @CODE@
ôki+Pron+Dem+Prox+A+Pl:ôki # "these" ; !!= @CODE@
ôhi+Pron+Dem+Prox+A+Obv:ôhi # "this/these" ; !!= @CODE@

ana+Pron+Dem+Med+A+Sg:ana # "that" ;
aniki+Pron+Dem+Med+A+Pl:aniki # "those" ;
anihi+Pron+Dem+Med+A+Obv:anihi # "that/those" ;

nâha+Pron+Dem+Dist+A+Sg:nâha # "that yonder" ;
nêki+Pron+Dem+Dist+A+Pl:nêki # "those yonder" ;
nêhi+Pron+Dem+Dist+A+Obv:nêhi # "this/those yonder" ;

!! INANIMATE \\

ôma+Pron+Dem+Prox+I+Sg:ôma # "this" ; !!= @CODE@
ôhi+Pron+Dem+Prox+I+Pl:ôhi # "these" ; !!= @CODE@

anima+Pron+Dem+Med+I+Sg:anima # "that" ;
anihi+Pron+Dem+Med+I+Pl:anihi # "those" ;

nêma+Pron+Dem+Dist+I+Sg:nêma # "that yonder" ;
nêhi+Pron+Dem+Dist+I+Pl:nêhi # "those yonder" ;

! Let us say a pronoun ôma without a noun is a definite, not a demonstrative
ôma+Pron+Def+Prox+I+Sg:ôma # "this one" ; !!= @CODE@
ôhi+Pron+Def+Prox+I+Pl:ôhi # "these ones" ; !!= @CODE@

anima+Pron+Def+Med+I+Sg:anima # "that one" ;
anihi+Pron+Def+Med+I+Pl:anihi # "those ones" ;

nêma+Pron+Def+Dist+I+Sg:nêma # "that yonder one" ;
nêhi+Pron+Def+Dist+I+Pl:nêhi # "those yonder ones" ;
! Copyright © 2015–2023 Alberta Language Technology Lab (ALTLab)
! http://altlab.ualberta.ca/
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU Affero General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version.
!
! This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
! but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
! MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
! GNU Affero General Public License for more details.
!
! You should have received a copy of the GNU Affero General Public License
! along with this program. If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

! ========================================================================== !
!! # Plains Cree particles                           
! ========================================================================== !

!! The file contains the following lexicons, with content as described:

LEXICON Particle !!= * @CODE@ adds +Ipc
+Ipc:0 # ;


LEXICON Particle/Interjection  !!= * @CODE@ adds +Ipc+Interj
+Ipc+Interj:0 # ;


LEXICON Particle/Name !!= * @CODE@ adds +Ipc+Prop
+Ipc+Prop:0 # ;


LEXICON Particle/Phrase !!= * @CODE@ adds +Ipc+Phr
+Ipc+Phr:0 # ;


LEXICON NONSTD !!= * @CODE@ +Ipc, but with non-standard orthography
+Ipc+Err/Orth: # ;

LEXICON DERIVATION_NOUN_STEMS
DRV-FST DERIVATION_NOUN_INFLECTION_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON DERIVATION_VERB_STEMS
DRV-FST DERIVATION_VERB_INFLECTION_SUFFIXES ;

!! Linking verb stems from Derivational FST to their inflectional suffixes

LEXICON DERIVATION_NOUN_INFLECTION_SUFFIXES
!! Nouns
@R.infl.NA-1@+Der/N:@R.infl.NA-1@ NA ;
@R.infl.NA-2@+Der/N:@R.infl.NA-2@ NA ;
@R.infl.NA-3@+Der/N:@R.infl.NA-3@ NA ;
@R.infl.NA-4@+Der/N:@R.infl.NA-4@ NA_SG/A_POSS/IM ;
@R.infl.NA-4w@+Der/N:@R.infl.NA-4w@ NA_SG/A_POSS/IM ;
@R.infl.NDA-1@+Der/N:@R.infl.NDA-1@ NAD ;
@R.infl.NDA-2@+Der/N:@R.infl.NDA-2@ NAD ;
@R.infl.NDA-3@+Der/N:@R.infl.NDA-3@ NAD ;
@R.infl.NDA-4@+Der/N:@R.infl.NDA-4@ NAD_SG/A ;
@R.infl.NDA-4w@+Der/N:@R.infl.NDA-4w@ NAD_SG/A ;
@R.infl.NDI-1@+Der/N:@R.infl.NDI-1@ NID ;
@R.infl.NDI-2@+Der/N:@R.infl.NDI-2@ NID ;
@R.infl.NDI-3@+Der/N:@R.infl.NDI-3@ NID ;
@R.infl.NDI-4@+Der/N:@R.infl.NDI-4@ NID_SG/I ;
@R.infl.NI-1@+Der/N:@R.infl.NI-1@ NI ;
@R.infl.NI-2@+Der/N:@R.infl.NI-2@ NI ;
@R.infl.NI-3@+Der/N:@R.infl.NI-3@ NI ;
@R.infl.NI-4@+Der/N:@R.infl.NI-4@ NI_SG/I_POSS/IM ;
@R.infl.NI-4w@+Der/N:@R.infl.NI-4w@ NI_SG/I_POSS/IM ;

LEXICON DERIVATION_VERB_INFLECTION_SUFFIXES
!! Verbs
@R.infl.VAIae@+Der/V:@R.infl.VAIae@ VAIae ;
@R.infl.VAIio@+Der/V:@R.infl.VAIio@ VAIio ;
@R.infl.VAI-2@+Der/V:@R.infl.VAI-2@ VAIn ;
@R.infl.VAI-3@+Der/V:@R.infl.VAI-3@ VAIm ;
@R.infl.VII-1n@+Der/V:@R.infl.VII-1n@ VIIn_SG ;
@R.infl.VII-1v@+Der/V:@R.infl.VII-1v@ VIIw_SG ;
@R.infl.VII-2n@+Der/V:@R.infl.VII-2n@ VIIn ;
@R.infl.VII-2v@+Der/V:@R.infl.VII-2v@ VIIw ;
@R.infl.VTA-1@+Der/V:@R.infl.VTA-1@ VTA ;
@R.infl.VTA-2@+Der/V:@R.infl.VTA-2@ VTA ;
@R.infl.VTA-3@+Der/V:@R.infl.VTA-3@ VTA ;
@R.infl.VTA-4@+Der/V:@R.infl.VTA-4@ VTAt ;
@R.infl.VTA-5@+Der/V:@R.infl.VTA-5@ VTAi ;
@R.infl.VTI-1@+Der/V:@R.infl.VTI-1@ VTIm ;
@R.infl.VTI-2@+Der/V:@R.infl.VTI-2@ VTIw ;
@R.infl.VTI-3@+Der/V:@R.infl.VTI-3@ VTIw ;

LEXICON Particles !!= * @CODE@ contains the actual list of particles.
ahâ Particle/Interjection ;
ahâw Particle/Interjection ;
ahpô% niya Particle/Phrase ;
akâmôtênâhk Particle ;
anohc% kâ-ispayik Particle/Phrase ;
asâwâc Particle ;
asiniy% kâ-kîsisot Particle/Name ;
asiskîwikamikowiyinînâhk Particle/Name ;
aspinoyê Particle/Interjection ;
atâmipêkohk Particle ;
awahê Particle/Interjection ;
awasi% ispî Particle/Phrase ;
awasi-tipahaskân Particle ;
awasitik Particle/Interjection ;
awîna Particle/Interjection ;
ay Particle/Interjection ;
ay-âskawi Particle ;
ay-hay Particle/Interjection ;
ayinânêw-kîsikâw Particle ;
ayiwâk% ohci Particle/Phrase ;
ayiwâkihkin Particle/Interjection ;
â Particle/Interjection ;
âh Particle/Interjection ;
âh-âpihtaw Particle ;
âha Particle/Interjection ;
âhâ Particle/Interjection ;
âhêy Particle/Interjection ;
âmaciwêspimowinihk Particle/Name ;
âniskê Particle ;
âs Particle/Interjection ;
âsay% cî Particle/Phrase ;
âsitê Particle ;
âstamik Particle/Interjection ;
âstamitê Particle ;
âw Particle/Interjection ;
âw% mâka Particle/Phrase ;
cah Particle/Interjection ;
câh-cîkâhtaw Particle ;
cîkahikan-sâkahikanihk Particle/Name ;
cîki Particle ;
cîst Particle/Interjection ;
êcika% ani Particle/Phrase ;
êha' Particle/Interjection ;
êhêy Particle/Interjection ;
êkâ% awiyak Particle/Phrase ;
êkâ% wiya Particle/Phrase ;
êkosi% ani% kiyâm Particle/Phrase ;
êkosi% mâka Particle/Phrase ;
êkosi% pitamâ Particle/Phrase ;
êkwa% ani% âsay Particle/Phrase ;
êkwa% wiya Particle/Phrase ;
êkwêyâc Particle ;
êsa% awa Particle/Phrase ;
êwako% êci% awa Particle/Phrase ;
êy% hêy Particle/Interjection ;
hay-hay Particle/Interjection ;
hâm Particle/Interjection ;
hâw% mâka Particle/Interjection ;
ispî Particle ;
itêhkê% isi Particle/Phrase ;
iyaw Particle/Interjection ;
iyinînâhk Particle/Name ;
îhî Particle/Interjection ;
kanikâ Particle ;
kayâm Particle/Interjection ;
kâ-âyimahk Particle/Name ;
kâ-kisîwêw Particle/Name ;
kâ-mahihkani-pimohtêw Particle/Name ;
kâ-mihkwaskwâki Particle/Name ;
kâ-miyosicik% kinosêwak Particle/Name ;
kâ-nikamômakahk Particle/Name ;
kâ-ohpawakâstahk Particle/Name ;
kâ-otasiskîkamikowak Particle/Name ;
kâ-pimwêwêhahk Particle/Name ;
kâ-sâpostamoki Particle/Name ;
kâ-tipêyihcikêt Particle/Name ;
kâ-yîkwawêt Particle/Name ;
kânikanâ Particle ;
kêkât Particle ;
kihci-môhkomâninâhk Particle/Name ;
kinêpiko-sâkahikanihk Particle/Name ;
kinwêsk Particle ;
kipoc Particle/Interjection ;
kistapinânihk Particle/Name ;
kiya% mâka Particle/Phrase ;
kîko% pîsim Particle/Phrase ;
kîkwây% ôma Particle/Phrase ;
kîpa Particle ;
kîwêtinohk% isi Particle/Phrase ;
kotak% pîsim Particle/Phrase ;
kôhkominânihk Particle/Name ;
kwêyask Particle ;
ma Particle ;
mah Particle/Interjection ;
mahti% êsa Particle/Phrase ;
maskêko-sâkahikanihk Particle/Name ;
mâka% mîna Particle/Phrase ;
mâmawêyas Particle ;
mâyi-mîtosiskâhk Particle/Name ;
mêkwânohk Particle ;
mihkwaskîwakâhk Particle/Name ;
misâskwatôminiskâhk Particle/Name ;
misi-pîtos Particle ;
misiwê% isi Particle/Phrase ;
mistatihkamêk% sâkahikanihk Particle/Name ;
miywanohk Particle ;
mostos% wapâsihk Particle/Name ;
môso-tâpiskanihk Particle/Name ;
môy% âhpô Particle/Phrase ;
môy% wîhkât Particle/Phrase ;
nah Particle/Interjection ;
nakîwacîhk Particle/Name ;
nama Particle ;
nama% nânitaw Particle/Phrase ;
namôya% cî Particle/Phrase ;
namwâc% apisîs Particle/Phrase ;
nawac% êkosi% isi Particle/Phrase ;
nâh-nêwo Particle ;
nânitaw% itê Particle/Phrase ;
nêhiyaw-askîhk Particle/Name ;
nêwo-kîsikâw Particle ;
nihcâwikihcikanisihk Particle/Name ;
nipiy% kâ-pahkihtik Particle/Name ;
nistam Particle ;
nisto-tipahikan Particle/Phrase ;
nitaki Particle/Interjection ;
niyâk Particle/Interjection ;
nîkânihk Particle ;
nîpisîhkopâhk Particle/Name ;
nîswaskisin Particle ;
okâminakasîskâhk Particle/Name ;
osâm% apisîs Particle/Phrase ;
otâkosî Particle ;
pakicahwânisihk Particle/Name ;
payâk Particle ;
pêyak-tipahikan Particle ;
pêyakwan% ispî Particle/Phrase ;
piko% itê% isi Particle/Phrase ;
pimicâskwêyâsihk Particle/Name ;
pisik Particle ;
sâkâstênohk% isi Particle/Phrase ;
sâsamîna Particle ;
sâskwatôn Particle/Name ;
tahto-askiy Particle ;
tak% ôt% âni Particle/Interjection ;
tastawâyihk Particle ;
tânisi% êkwa Particle/Phrase ;
tânitahto% tipahikan Particle/Phrase ;
tâniwâtokê Particle ;
tâpwê% wiya% ani Particle/Phrase ;
tipân Particle ;
wa Particle/Interjection ;
wapâsihk Particle/Name ;
wâ Particle/Interjection ;
wâcistakâc Particle/Interjection ;
wâh-wahwâ Particle/Interjection ;
wâsakâ Particle ;
wâskicôsihk Particle/Name ;
wîhcêkaskosîwi-sâkahikanihk Particle/Name ;
yâkwâ Particle/Interjection ;
yâyâhk% êtikwê Particle/Interjection ;
yîpêyâmatin Particle ;
yôho Particle/Interjection ;
LEXICON NON_STANDARD
êkosi:êkos NONSTD ;
mîna:mîn NONSTD ;
mâka:mâk NONSTD ;
êsa:ês NONSTD ;
êwako:êwak NONSTD ;
mitoni:miton NONSTD ;
êkwa:êkw2 NONSTD ;
tânisi:tânis NONSTD ;
tânisi:tânsi NONSTD ;
mistahi:mistah NONSTD ;
piko:pikw2 NONSTD ;
ohci:ohc NONSTD ;
êtikwê:êtikw2 NONSTD ;
konita:konit NONSTD ;
isi:îs NONSTD ;
mêtoni:mêton NONSTD ;
êtikwê:êtik NONSTD ;
êcika:êcik NONSTD ;
tânêhki:tânêhk NONSTD ;
kâwi:kâw2 NONSTD ;
mâcika:mâcik NONSTD ;
mahti:maht NONSTD ;
cikêmâ:cikêmô NONSTD ;
êtokwê:êtokw2 NONSTD ;
êtokê:êtok NONSTD ;
âkwâskam:âhkwâskam NONSTD ;
pôti:pôt NONSTD ;
otâkosîhk:otâkosihk NONSTD ;
cîki:cîk NONSTD ;
asici:asic NONSTD ;
sôskwâc:sôskwâ NONSTD ;
êkotowahk:êkwatowahk NONSTD ;
misawâc:misawât NONSTD ;
konita:konic NONSTD ;
nama:nam NONSTD ;
sapiko:sapikw2 NONSTD ;
mitoni:miconi NONSTD ;
apisîs:âpisis NONSTD ;
piskihci:piskihc NONSTD ;
kîkisêpâ:kêkisêpâ NONSTD ;
